Arkansas, session 2025, HB1959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
The General Assembly intends this act to:
(1) Abolish the use of a writ of scire facias as the means of
reviving an outstanding judgment; and
(2) Simplify the process to revive an outstanding judgment.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-65-501 is amended to read as follows:
16-65-501. Scire facias Revival of outstanding judgment.
(a)(1) The plaintiff judgment creditor or his or her legal
representatives at any time before the expiration of the lien of a judgment
may sue out a scire facias to revive the judgment file notice that the
*CEB089*
04-09-2025 10:35:33 CEB089

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1959
judgment is still outstanding in accordance with this section to revive the
judgment.
(2) The notice shall include with respect to the judgment:
(A) The names of the judgment debtor and judgment
creditor;
(B) The name of the court and case number in which the
judgment was rendered;
(C) The current balance of the judgment after all payments
and other credits; and
(D) A statement that the judgment creditor intends to
maintain the judgment creditor's lien of judgment against any property of the
judgment debtor located in the county in which the notice is filed.
(b)(1) The scire facias A copy of the notice shall be served on the
defendant or his or her legal representatives, terre-tenants, or other person
occupying the land, and may be directed to and served in any county in this
state judgment debtor via first class mail, postage prepaid, and addressed to
the judgment debtor at the judgment debtor's last known address.
(c)(1) If the defendant cannot be found, the court shall make an order
briefly setting forth the nature of the case and requiring all persons
interested to appear on a date set by the court and show cause why the
judgment or decree should not be revived and lien continued.
(2) A If the current whereabouts of the judgment debtor are
unknown such that the judgment debtor cannot be served via first class mail,
a copy of the order notice shall be put up for four (4) weeks at the
courthouse door of the county in which the judgment or decree may have been
rendered.
(d) If upon service or publication of the scire facias, as required in
subsection (c) of this section, the defendant or any other person interested
does not appear and show cause why such judgment or decree shall not be
revived, the judgment shall be revived and the lien continued for another
period of ten (10) years and so on from time to time as often as may be
necessary.
(e)(c)(1) If a scire facias is sued out the notice is filed on or
before the termination expiration of the lien of any judgment or decree, the
lien of the judgment revived shall have relation to the day on which the
scire facias issued notice is filed.
04-09-2025 10:35:33 CEB089

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1959
(f)(2) No scire facias to revive a judgment shall be issued
revived except within ten (10) years from the date of the rendition of the
judgment, or if the judgment shall have been previously revived, then within
ten (10) years from the order of revivor filing of the previous notice.
(g)(1) Unless before the expiration of a judgment the notice under
subdivision (g)(2) of this section is recorded in the real property records
of a county other than the county in which an action under this section is
filed:
(A) A scire facias to revive the judgment is not effective
in the county other than the county in which an action under this section is
filed; and
(B)(i) A recorded judgment lien may not be revived against
real property in the county other than the county in which an action under
this section is filed.
(ii) This subdivision (g)(1)(B) does not prevent a
judgment creditor from registering a judgment or recording a judgment lien in
a new county after a judgment is obtained or revived.
(2) The notice shall include with respect to the action:
(A) The names of the judgment debtors and judgment
creditors;
(B) The name of the court and case number in which the
judgment was rendered;
(C) The name of the county in which the petition for a
writ of scire facias was filed;
(D) The date on which the petition was filed; and
(E) A statement that the filing party intends to maintain
its judgment lien against any property of the judgment debtor located in the
county in which the notice is filed.
(d) A judgment that is recorded in the real property records of a
county other than the county in which a notice under this section is filed
may be revived and the lien continued by recording a copy of the filed
notice.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 21-6-402(b), concerning the fees to be
charged by the clerks of the circuit courts, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
04-09-2025 10:35:33 CEB089

As Engrossed: H4/9/25 HB1959
(10) For filing notice of outstanding judgment under § 16-65-501
............. 20.00.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 21-6-403(a), concerning the uniform filing
fees to be charged by the clerks of court, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The uniform filing fees to be charged by the clerks of the
circuit courts for initiating or reopening a cause of action in the circuit
courts in the state shall be as prescribed in this section.
(2) A revival of an outstanding judgment under § 16-65-501 shall
not be charged a reopening fee under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(3) No portion of the filing fees shall be refunded.

/s/M. Brown























04-09-2025 10:35:33 CEB089